Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 63 Use of Theft Detection Devices

11-63-1.
Unlawful use and/or removal of theft detection shielding devices.

A person commits unlawful use of a theft detection shielding device when he or she knowingly manufactures, sells, offers for sale or distributes in any way a laminated or coated bag or device peculiar to and marketed for shielding and intended to shield merchandise from detection by an electronic or magnetic theft alarm sensor.

A person commits unlawful possession of a theft detection shielding device when he or she knowingly possesses any laminated or coated bag or device peculiar to and designed for shielding and intended to shield merchandise from detection by an electronic or magnetic theft alarm sensor, with the intent to commit theft or retail theft.

A person commits unlawful possession of a theft detection device remover when he or she knowingly possesses any tool or device designed to allow the removal of any theft detection device from any merchandise with the intent to use the tool to remove any theft detection device from any merchandise without the permission of the merchant or person owning or holding the merchandise.

A person commits unlawful removal of a theft detection device when he or she intentionally removes the device from merchandise prior to purchase.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 282, § 1.

11-63-2.
Detention of persons suspected of unlawful use and/or removal of theft detection devices — Reasonable cause.

The activation of an anti-shoplifting or inventory control device as a result of a person exiting the establishment or a protected area within the establishment shall constitute reasonable cause for the detention of the person exiting by the owner or operator of the establishment or by an agent or employee of the owner or operator, provided sufficient notice has been posted to advise the patrons that the device is being utilized. Each detention shall be made only in a reasonable manner and only for a reasonable period of time sufficient for any inquiry into the circumstances surrounding the activation of the device or for the recovery of goods.

The taking into custody and detention by a law enforcement officer, merchant, or merchant’s employee, if done in compliance with all the requirements of this section, shall not render law enforcement officer, merchant, or merchant’s employee criminally or civilly liable for false arrest, false imprisonment, or unlawful detention.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 282, § 1.

11-63-3.
Penalties for violation.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be subject to a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or shall be imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 282, § 1.